Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-409
License, defined.

License shall mean any license to conduct a lottery or raffle as provided in section 9-424 or any license for a utilization-of-funds member as provided in such section.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 130;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 99.